Washington statutes.
RCW 9.08.074

Transferring stolen pet animal to a person who has previously sold a stolen pet animal to a research institution—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for any person, who knows or has reason to know that a pet animal has been stolen or fraudulently obtained, to sell or otherwise transfer the pet animal to another who the person knows or has reason to know has previously sold a stolen or fraudulently obtained pet animal to a research institution in the state of Washington.

(2) A conviction under this section is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW and by a mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars per pet animal.

[ 2003 c 53 s 11.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.